Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.375

Child care—Rental of suitable space.

An agency may identify space they wish to use for child care facilities or they may request assistance from the department of enterprise services in identifying the availability of suitable space in state-owned or state-leased buildings for use as child care centers for the children of state employees.

When suitable space is identified in state-owned or state-leased buildings, the department of enterprise services shall establish a rental rate for organizations to pay for the space used by persons who are not state employees.

[ 2015 c 225 s 53; 1993 c 194 s 2; 1984 c 162 s 2.]

NOTES: